Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0927.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109y. (1) The department shall provide coverage under the medical assistance program to an eligible individual for behavioral health transport. (2) The department shall require a behavioral health agency to comply with section 987 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1987. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Behavioral health transport" means that term as defined in section 981 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1981. (b) "Behavioral health transport agency" means the owner or operator of a behavioral health transport. (c) "Eligible individual" means that term as defined in section 981 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1981. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 928 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.